Washington statutes.
RCW 18.86.100

Imputed knowledge and notice.

Unless otherwise agreed to in writing, a principal does not have knowledge or notice of any facts known by an agent of the principal that are not actually known by the principal.

[ 2023 c 318 s 10; 2013 c 58 s 11; 1996 c 179 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 318: See note following RCW 18.86.010.